District of Columbia statutes.
7-2502.14

Registration of self-defense sprays.

(a)

A person 18 years of age or older must register the self-defense spray at the time of purchase by completing a standard registration form.

(b)

The vendor must forward the registration form to the Metropolitan Police Department.

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title II, § 214
as added Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-244, § 2, 40 DCR 647
1981 Ed., § 6-2324.